Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-9,113
Employees retirement system; required contributions; payment; membership service annuity; computations.

(1)(a) Commencing September 1, 1969, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be two and three-fourths percent of the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars of salary or wages earned each fiscal year and five percent of salary or wages earned above that amount in the same fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 1976, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be two and nine-tenths percent of the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars of salary or wages earned each fiscal year and five and twenty-five hundredths percent of salary or wages earned above that amount in the same fiscal year. Commencing on September 1, 1982, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be four and nine-tenths percent of the compensation earned in each fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 1989, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be five and eight-tenths percent of the compensation earned in each fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 1995, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be six and three-tenths percent of the compensation earned in each fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 2007, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be seven and three-tenths percent of the compensation paid in each fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 2009, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be eight and three-tenths percent of the compensation paid in each fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 2011, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be nine and three-tenths percent of the compensation paid in each fiscal year. Commencing September 1, 2013, all employees of the school district shall contribute an amount equal to the membership contribution which shall be nine and seventy-eight hundredths percent of the compensation paid in each fiscal year.

(b) The contributions by the school district in any fiscal year beginning on or after September 1, 1999, shall be the greater of (i) one hundred percent of the contributions by the employees for such fiscal year or (ii) such amount as may be necessary to maintain the solvency of the system, as determined annually by the board of education upon recommendation of the actuary and the board of trustees.

(c) The contributions by the school district in any fiscal year beginning on or after September 1, 2007, and prior to September 1, 2018, shall be the greater of (i) one hundred one percent of the contributions by the employees for such fiscal year or (ii) such amount as may be necessary to maintain the solvency of the system, as determined annually by the board of education upon recommendation of the actuary retained by the board of trustees and after considering any amounts that will be, or are expected to be, contributed to the system pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966. The amount necessary to maintain the solvency of the system as determined in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (c) shall be transmitted by the school district to the account of the retirement system no later than August 31, 2018. The school district contributions specified in subdivision (i) of this subdivision (c) shall be made monthly and shall be immediately transmitted to the account of the retirement system.

(d) The contributions by the school district in any fiscal year beginning on or after September 1, 2018, and prior to September 1, 2024, shall be the greater of (i) one hundred one percent of the contributions by the employees for such fiscal year or (ii) such amount as may be necessary to maintain the solvency of the system, as determined annually by the board of education upon recommendation of the actuary retained by the board of trustees and after considering any amounts contributed by the state pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966 that will be, or are expected to be, contributed to the school district by the State Treasurer. The amount necessary to maintain the solvency of the system as determined in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (d) shall be transmitted by the school district to the account of the retirement system no later than August 31, 2019, and each August 31 thereafter. The school district contributions specified in subdivision (i) of this subdivision (d) shall be made monthly and shall be immediately transmitted to the account of the retirement system.

(e) The contributions by the school district in any fiscal year beginning on or after September 1, 2024, shall be the greater of:

(i) One hundred one percent of the contributions by the employees for such fiscal year; or

(ii) Such amount as may be necessary to maintain the solvency of the system, as determined annually by the board of education upon recommendation of the actuary retained by the retirement board pursuant to section 79-984 and after considering any amounts contributed by the state pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966 that will be, or are expected to be, transferred to the school district by the State Treasurer for contribution by the school district to the retirement system.

(f) The amount necessary to maintain the solvency of the system as determined in subdivision (1)(e)(ii) of this section shall be transmitted by the school district to the Class V School Employees Retirement Fund no later than August 31, 2025, and each August 31 thereafter.

(g) The school district contributions specified in subdivision (1)(e)(i) of this section shall be made monthly and shall be immediately transmitted to the Class V School Employees Retirement Fund.

(h) Nothing in this section prohibits the school district from making other contributions in addition to the contributions required pursuant to this section.

(i) The employee's contribution shall be made in the form of a monthly deduction from compensation as provided in subsection (2) of this section and shall be immediately transmitted to the account of the retirement system. Every employee who is a member of the system shall be deemed to consent and agree to such deductions and shall receipt in full for compensation, and payment to such employee of compensation less such deduction shall constitute a full and complete discharge of all claims and demands whatsoever for services rendered by such employee during the period covered by such payment except as to benefits provided under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

(j) After September 1, 1963, and prior to September 1, 1969, all employees shall be credited with a membership service annuity which shall be nine-tenths of one percent of salary or wage covered by old age and survivors insurance and one and one-half percent of salary or wages above that amount, except that those employees who retire on or after August 31, 1969, shall be credited with a membership service annuity which shall be one percent of salary or wages covered by old age and survivors insurance and one and sixty-five hundredths percent of salary or wages above that amount for service performed after September 1, 1963, and prior to September 1, 1969. Commencing September 1, 1969, all employees shall be credited with a membership service annuity which shall be one percent of the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars of salary or wages earned by the employee during each fiscal year and one and sixty-five hundredths percent of salary or wages earned above that amount in the same fiscal year, except that all employees retiring on or after August 31, 1976, shall be credited with a membership service annuity which shall be one and forty-four hundredths percent of the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars of salary or wages earned by the employee during such fiscal year and two and four-tenths percent of salary or wages earned above that amount in the same fiscal year, and the retirement annuities of employees who have not retired prior to September 1, 1963, and who elected under the provisions of section 79-988 as such section existed immediately prior to February 20, 1982, not to become members of the system shall not be less than they would have been had they remained under any preexisting system to date of retirement.

(k) Members of this system having the service qualifications of members of the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, as provided by section 79-926, who are members of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act prior to July 1, 2016, shall receive the state service annuity provided by sections 79-933 to 79-935 and 79-951.

(2) The school district shall pick up the employee contributions required by this section for all compensation paid on or after January 1, 1985, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining federal tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code, except that the school district shall continue to withhold federal income taxes based upon these contributions until the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be included as gross income of the employee until such time as they are distributed or made available. The school district shall pay these employee contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying earnings to the employee. The school district shall pick up these contributions by a salary deduction either through a reduction in the cash salary of the employee or a combination of a reduction in salary and offset against a future salary increase. Beginning September 1, 1995, the school district shall also pick up any contributions required by sections 79-990, 79-991, and 79-992 which are made under an irrevocable payroll deduction authorization between the member and the school district, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining federal tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code, except that the school district shall continue to withhold federal and state income taxes based upon these contributions until the Internal Revenue Service rules that, pursuant to section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be included as gross income of the employee until such time as they are distributed from the system. Employee contributions picked up shall be treated for all purposes of the Class V School Employees Retirement Act in the same manner and to the extent as employee contributions made prior to the date picked up.

Laws 1951, c. 274, § 25, p. 923;

Laws 1953, c. 308, § 4, p. 1029;

Laws 1955, c. 321, § 3, p. 993;

Laws 1963, c. 490, § 5, p. 1567;

Laws 1969, c. 724, § 2, p. 2755;

Laws 1972, LB 1116, § 3;

Laws 1976, LB 994, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 131, § 12;

Laws 1983, LB 488, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 218, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 237, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 505, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 77;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-1056;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 648;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 33;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 26;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 63;

Laws 2000, LB 155, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB596, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB187, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB382, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 35;

Laws 2013, LB553, § 14;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 42;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 32;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 35;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 33.
July 18, 2026
For provisions of federal Social Security Act, see Chapter 68, article 6.